Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2023
Auditor of Public Accounts; annual
audit; report to Clerk of the Legislature.

It shall be the
duty of the Auditor of Public Accounts to make an annual audit of the retirement
system and submit electronically an annual
report to the Clerk of the Legislature of its condition. Each member of the
Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such
report by making a request for it to the Auditor of Public Accounts.

Laws 1947, c. 211, § 10, p. 689;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 14;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 24;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 60-450;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 212.